North Carolina, session 2025, SB751.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 59.2 of S.L. 2013-413 is repealed.
SECTION 2. The Commission for Public Health shall readopt a rule substantively
identical to 15A NCAC 13B .0105 as it existed on August 22, 2013. Rules adopted pursuant to
this section are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) as
though 10 or more written objections had been received as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 3. Until the effective date of the readopted rule that the Commission for
Public Health is required to adopt pursuant to Section 2 of this act, the Commission and the
Department of Environmental Quality shall implement 15A NCAC 13B .0105 as it existed prior
to the effective date of S.L. 2013-413.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S751-v-1*